uz_UZ.aff
SFX X 0 maydiganimizdadir [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganimizda-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganimizdadir-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganimizdamikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganimizda-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganingizni [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganingiznimi [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganingiznidir [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganingizni-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganingiznidir-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganingiznimikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganingizni-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganingizning [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganingizningmi [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganingizningdir [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganingizning-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganingizningdir-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganingizningmikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganingizning-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganingizga [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganingizgami [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganingizgadir [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganingizga-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganingizgadir-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganingizgamikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganingizga-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganingizdan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganingizdanmi [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganingizdandir [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganingizdan-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganingizdandir-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganingizdanmikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganingizdan-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganingizda [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganingizdami [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganingizdadir [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganingizda-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganingizdadir-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganingizdamikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganingizda-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarningmi [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarningdir [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarning-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarningdir-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarningmikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarning-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimni [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimnimi [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimnidir [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimni-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimnidir-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimnimikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimni-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimning [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimningmi [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimningdir [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimning-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimningdir-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimningmikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimning-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimga [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimgami [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimgadir [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimga-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimgadir-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimgamikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimga-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimdan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimdanmi [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimdandir [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimdan-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimdandir-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimdanmikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimdan-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimda [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimdami [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimdadir [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimda-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimdadir-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimdamikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimda-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarini [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarinimi [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarinidir [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarini-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarinidir-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarinimikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarini-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarining [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlariningmi [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlariningdir [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarining-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlariningdir-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlariningmikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarining-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlariga [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarigami [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarigadir [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlariga-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarigadir-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarigamikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlariga-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlaridan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlaridanmi [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlaridandir [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlaridan-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlaridandir-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlaridanmikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlaridan-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarida [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlaridami [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlaridadir [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarida-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlaridadir-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlaridamikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarida-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimizni [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimiznimi [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimiznidir [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimizni-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimiznidir-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimiznimikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimizni-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimizning [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimizningmi [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimizningdir [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimizning-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimizningdir-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimizningmikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimizning-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimizga [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimizgami [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimizgadir [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimizga-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimizgadir-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimizgamikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimizga-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimizdan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimizdanmi [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimizdandir [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimizdan-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimizdandir-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimizdanmikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimizdan-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimizda [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimizdami [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimizdadir [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimizda-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimizdadir-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimizdamikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimizda-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlaringizni [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlaringiznimi [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlaringiznidir [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlaringizni-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlaringiznidir-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlaringiznimikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlaringizni-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlaringizning [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlaringizningmi [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlaringizningdir [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlaringizning-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlaringizningdir-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlaringizningmikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlaringizning-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlaringizga [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlaringizgami [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlaringizgadir [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlaringizga-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlaringizgadir-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlaringizgamikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlaringizga-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlaringizdan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlaringizdanmi [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlaringizdandir [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlaringizdan-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlaringizdandir-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlaringizdanmikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlaringizdan-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlaringizda [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlaringizdami [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlaringizdadir [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlaringizda-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlaringizdadir-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlaringizdamikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlaringizda-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yingni [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yingnimi [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yingnidir [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yingni-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yingnidir-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yingnimikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yingni-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yingga [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yinggami [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yinggadir [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yingga-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yinggadir-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yinggamikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yingga-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yingdan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yingdanmi [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yingdandir [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yingdan-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yingdandir-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yingdanmikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yingdan-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yingda [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yingdami [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yingdadir [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yingda-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yingdadir-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yingdamikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yingda-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 ydiganingni [aeiou]
SFX X 0 ydiganingnimi [aeiou]
SFX X 0 ydiganingnidir [aeiou]
SFX X 0 ydiganingni-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 ydiganingnidir-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 ydiganingnimikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 ydiganingni-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 ydiganingga [aeiou]
SFX X 0 ydiganinggami [aeiou]
SFX X 0 ydiganinggadir [aeiou]
SFX X 0 ydiganingga-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 ydiganinggadir-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 ydiganinggamikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 ydiganingga-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 ydiganingdan [aeiou]
