uz_UZ.dic
achchiqla/X
adiplat/X
agʻna/X
akaklat/X
aktivla/X
aldash/X
allala/X
andavalat/X
aniqlan/X
arabchala/X
arillat/X
artish/X
asfaltlash/X
astarlash/X
avomlashtir/X
ayal/X
aylantirgiz/X
ayriboshlan/X
azoblanish/X
badhollan/X
baholattir/X
balansla/X
baravarla/X
basitlash/X
bayramlash/X
bekil/X
belilla/X
berish/X
betartiblan/X
bezakla/X
bezilla/X
bigʻillat/X
bildiril/X
bilvol/X
birkit/X
bittir/X
bogʻlattir/X
boʻjray/X
boʻlinish/X
boʻrsit/X
boʻshlan/X
boʻyla/X
bolsheviklash/X
boq/X
boshqachalash/X
botirgiz/X
bozorla/X
bukish/X
bulgʻan/X
burgala/X
burqit/X
butunlash/X
buzoqla/X
chaldiril/X
chalqaytir/X
changlantir/X
chaqalan/X
chaqmoqla/X
charxlattir/X
chayil/X
chay/X
chekinish/X
chetlash/X
chikilla/X
chimir/X
chiqazil/X
chirit/X
chirsillash/X
chiyqilla/X
chogʻlan/X
choʻkkalan/X
choʻmiltir/X
choʻqqaytir/X
choʻz/X
chorchila/X
chuhchuhla/X
churqchurqlash/X
chuvchuvla/X
dagʻallashtir/X
damlat/X
dargʻazablan/X
davolantir/X
daʼvolash/X
deontologiya/X
differensialla/X
dimiqtir/X
diskussiyalash/X
doʻlan/X
doʻpirlat/X
doʻstlash/X
dozalashtiril/X
dukurlash/X
dutdutla/X
egdir/X
ek/X
elitil/X
emla/X
ergashtir/X
esankirat/X
eslat/X
ezgila/X
faollashtir/X
firuzalan/X
galalan/X
gangira/X
gardishla/X
gerdaytir/X
gʻamlan/X
gʻazablan/X
gʻiloflan/X
gʻingshi/X
gʻivirlash/X
gʻoʻngʻirla/X
gʻujla/X
gibridlashtir/X
gipslash/X
grimlat/X
gumonsiran/X
gurkira/X
gutgutla/X
hakkala/X
hangrash/X
harsillat/X
hayallat/X
hayosizlash/X
hijjalat/X
hiringla/X
hoʻpla/X
hoyhuyla/X
hurkit/X
huzurlash/X
ideallashtiril/X
ijirgʻan/X
ildir/X
iliqtir/X
imilla/X
indir/X
inglizchala/X
inqilobiylashtir/X
inventarizatsiyala/X
irgʻishlat/X
isbotlan/X
ishonqira/X
ishshay/X
islan/X
istifodalan/X
ivi/X
iylan/X
izlayver/X
jadallash/X
jamlan/X
jarohatla/X
jazola/X
jildlat/X
jilvira/X
jingʻirla/X
jirkan/X
johillash/X
joʻshqinlash/X
joylan/X
jurʼatlantir/X
kaldira/X
kamittir/X
karbonlan/X
kattakonlash/X
kayflan/X
kechlattir/X
kelol/X
kengayt/X
kesat/X
ketkazdir/X
kichraytir/X
kirgiz/X
kirtilla/X
kiygiz/X
koagulyatsiyalashtir/X
koʻkanla/X
koʻmaklashish/X
koʻpayish/X
koʻplash/X
koʻrkamlash/X
koʻzik/X
konveyerlash/X
kristallashtiril/X
kufrlan/X
kultivatsiyalash/X
kuydirtir/X
lanjlan/X
liqillat/X
loyihalashtir/X
mahkamla/X
mashaqqatlantiril/X
maymoqlan/X
mexanizatsiyalantir/X
miltirash/X
mixlan/X
moʻralash/X
moyla/X
mukchay/X
musaffolash/X
naflan/X
navbatlan/X
niqla/X
nolit/X
noziklash/X
oborish/X
ogʻdirtir/X
oʻchiril/X
oʻksi/X
oʻngʻaysizlan/X
oʻqtalish/X
oʻrla/X
oʻtattir/X
oʻtqazdir/X
oʻymala/X
oʻz/X
olqat/X
oqartiril/X
orqalattir/X
oshlattir/X
ovovla/X
ozodalash/X
parchinlan/X
pastla/X
pessimistlash/X
pirqirat/X
pitrat/X
poʻshtla/X
poylash/X
pusqur/X
qahqahla/X
qamchilash/X
qaqsha/X
qashla/X
qavatlan/X
qaytalan/X
qigʻilla/X
qirdirtir/X
qisqartiril/X
qiymala/X
qizdir/X
qoʻltiqlat/X
qoʻrqinqira/X
qoliplan/X
qoplattir/X
qoshiqla/X
qulaylashtir/X
qurdir/X
qutblan/X
quvontiril/X
ragʻbatlantiril/X
ravshanlantir/X
rizqlantir/X
sahnalashtiril/X
sandirat/X
sargʻayt/X
sayozlan/X
sensira/X
sevil/X
shakllash/X
shapoqlash/X
shattalash/X
shildirash/X
shingʻray/X
shivalash/X
shopirin/X
shubhalantir/X
sikllashtir/X
simvollashtir/X
siqimlat/X
sirtmoqlan/X
siyraklashtir/X
sogʻdir/X
soʻndirtir/X
soldirgiz/X
sovuqlash/X
suffikslash/X
suqtiril/X
surtil/X
suyanil/X
suzish/X
takmillashtir/X
tamaddilan/X
tanlan/X
taqiqlan/X
taratil/X
tarvaqayla/X
tashvishsira/X
tayanish/X
taʼriflan/X
tekisla/X
tepintir/X
tesh/X
tikiltir/X
tilkalan/X
tinglat/X
tiqish/X
tirmalash/X
tisla/X
tizimlashtir/X
toʻkisla/X
toʻl/X
toʻppay/X
toʻstir/X
tojikilash/X
topishtir/X
torttiril/X
tozalatil/X
tug/X
turgʻunlash/X
tushla/X
tutqila/X
tuz/X
ufur/X
umidsizlan/X
uqalat/X
ushat/X
uxlatil/X
uyumla/X
vadillash/X
vangʻirla/X
ventilyatsiyalan/X
vorilla/X
xaroblan/X
xezlash/X
xitoychala/X
xolilan/X
xuliganlash/X
yalab-yulqi/X
yaltiratil/X
yaqinlash/X
yasattir/X
yayla/X
yelimlash/X
yerla/X
yigʻdir/X
yiril/X
yogʻsizlash/X
yoʻrgaklat/X
yomonlashtir/X
yoptir/X
yorugʻlantir/X
yovuzlash/X
yugurish/X
yumshal/X
yuril/X
yuzlashtiril/X
zaranglan/X
zidlashtir/X
zoʻriq/X
